Massachusetts, session 194th, S1617.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 27A the following section:-
Section 27B. (a)(1) It shall be unlawful to sell a nonprescription material, compound,
mixture or preparation containing any detectable quantity of dextromethorphan, its salts or
optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers to any person under the age of 18.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person under the age of 18 to purchase or attempt to
purchase a nonprescription material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any detectable
quantity of dextromethorphan, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers.
(3) A nonprescription material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any
detectable quantity of dextromethorphan, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers
of 3

shall not be sold unless the purchaser presents photo identification that validates the individual’s
age or from the purchaser’s outward appearance the person making the sale would reasonably
presume the purchaser to be twenty-seven years of age or older. Valid identification shall include
a valid, current form of photo identification issued by a federal, state, county or municipal
government, or subdivision or agency thereof, including but not limited to a motor vehicle
operator’s license, a Massachusetts state identification card, an identification card issued to a
member of the Armed Forces or a passport.
(4) Nothing in the act shall be construed to impose any compliance requirement on a
retail entity other than manually obtaining and verifying proof of age as a condition of sale,
including placement of products in a specific place within a store, other restrictions on
consumers’ direct access to finished drug products, or the maintenance of transaction records.
Any manufacturer, distributor, or retailer whose employee or representative, during the course of
the employee or representative’s employment or association with the manufacturer, distributor,
or retailer sells or trades dextromethorphan in violation of paragraph (1) shall receive a warning
letter from the state Bureau of Health Care Safety and Quality for the first such violation. Any
employee or representative of a manufacturer, distributor, or retailer who, during the course of
employee or representative’s employment or association with that manufacturer distributor, or
retailer sells or trades dextromethorphan in violation of paragraph (1) shall be subject to a civil
penalty in an amount of a) not more than $150 for the second such violation by a person b) not
more than $250 for the third such violation or subsequent such violation by a person. Any person
who purchases dextromethorphan in violation of paragraph (2) is subject to a civil fine of $50.
of 3

(b) This section shall not apply to a compound, mixture or preparation containing any
detectable quantity of dextromethorphan which is dispensed pursuant to a valid prescription from
a licensed practitioner with prescriptive authority.
(c) This act preempts any ordinance regulating the sale, distribution, receipt, or
possession of dextromethorphan enacted by a county, city, town, or other political subdivision of
this state, and dextromethorphan is not subject to further regulation by such subdivisions.
of 3